Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1584
Department; assistance from local, state, or federal agencies.

The department may request and utilize assistance in the administration of the Nebraska Soil and Water Conservation Fund from natural resources districts, from the Natural Resources Conservation Service and the Farm Service Agency of the United States Department of Agriculture, and from any other appropriate local, state, or federal agencies. Such assistance may include accepting and approving applications for funds and designing, laying out, and certifying the proper completion of projects and practices.

Laws 1983, LB 236, § 7;

Laws 1993, LB 247, § 3;

Laws 1999, LB 403, § 3;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 30.